Maine, session 132, LD174.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §6355, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Religious exemption. The parent states in writing a sincere religious belief that is
contrary to the immunization requirement of this subchapter.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §6355, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 154, §3, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §6358, sub-§1, as corrected by RR 2019, c. 1, Pt. A, §17, is
amended to read:
1. Rules authorized. The commissioner and the Director of the Maine Center for
Disease Control and Prevention within the Department of Health and Human Services shall
jointly issue rules necessary for the effective implementation of this subchapter, including,
but not limited to, rules specifying those diseases for which immunization is required and
establishing school record keeping record-keeping and reporting requirements or
guidelines and procedures for the exclusion of nonimmunized children from school. The
rules may not include any provision governing medical exemptions. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subchapter are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2‑A except that rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter specifying the diseases
for which immunization is required are major substantive rules as defined in Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 4. 20-A MRSA §6359, sub-§3, ¶C is enacted to read:
C. The student or the parent, if the student is a minor, states in writing a sincere
religious belief that is contrary to the immunization requirement of this subchapter.
Sec. 5. 20-A MRSA §6359, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2019, c. 154, §7, is further
amended to read:
6. Rules; requirements; reports. The Director of the Maine Center for Disease
Control and Prevention within the Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt
rules necessary for the effective implementation of this subchapter, including, but not
limited to, rules establishing immunization requirements for each disease, school record
keeping record-keeping and reporting requirements or guidelines and procedures for the
exclusion of nonimmunized students from school. The rules may not include any provision
governing medical exemptions. Rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter are routine
technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A except that rules adopted
pursuant to this subchapter specifying the diseases for which immunization is required are
major substantive rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Immunization requirements more stringent than the provisions of this subchapter may be
adopted by a school board or by policy of a private school's governing board.
Sec. 6. 22 MRSA §802, sub-§4-A, ¶C-1 is enacted to read:
C-1. "Health care practitioner" means a person certified, registered or licensed in the
healing arts, including, but not limited to, a physician, nurse, podiatrist, optometrist,
chiropractor, physical therapist, dentist, psychologist and physician assistant.
Sec. 7. 22 MRSA §802, sub-§4-B, ¶D is enacted to read:
Page 1 - 132LR0088(01)

D. A religious exemption is available to a health care practitioner who states in writing
a sincere religious belief that is contrary to the immunization requirement of this
subchapter.
Sec. 8. 22 MRSA §8402, sub-§3, ¶A, as amended by PL 2019, c. 154, §10 and
affected by §12, is further amended to read:
A. The department shall adopt rules regarding the health of staff as required to protect
the health and safety of the children. The rules must include a requirement that every
2 years each licensee, administrator or other staff member of the nursery school who
provides care for children be declared free from communicable disease by a licensed
physician, nurse practitioner or physician assistant, except that this requirement may
be waived for a person who objects on the grounds of a sincere religious belief. Rules
adopted pursuant to this paragraph are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 9. PL 2019, c. 154, §11 is repealed.
Sec. 10. Rules. The Department of Education and the Department of Health and
Human Services shall amend their rules in order to provide for exempting persons from
immunization requirements on the grounds of a sincere religious belief in accordance with
this Act. Rules adopted pursuant to this section are routine technical rules pursuant to the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A, section 6358, subsection 1 and section 6359,
subsection 6 and Title 22, section 802, subsection 3 and section 8402, subsection 3,
paragraph A.